District of Columbia statutes.
3-1201.01

General definitions.

For the purposes of this chapter, the term:

(1)

“Board” means the Board of Audiology and Speech-Language Pathology, [the] Board of Chiropractic, the Board of Dentistry, the Board of Dietetics and Nutrition, the Board of Marriage and Family Therapy, the Board of Medicine, the Board of Nursing, the Board of Long-Term Care Administration, the Board of Occupational Therapy, the Board of Optometry, the Board of Pharmacy, the Board of Physical Therapy, the Board of Podiatry, the Board of Professional Counseling, the Board of Psychology, the Board of Respiratory Care, the Board of Social Work, or the Board of Veterinary Medicine, established by this chapter, as the context requires.

(1A)

“Boards of Allied Health” means the Board of Audiology and Speech-Language Pathology, the Board of Dentistry, the Board of Dietetics and Nutrition, the Board of Massage Therapy, the Board of Long-Term Care Administration, the Board of Occupational Therapy, the Board of Optometry, the Board of Physical Therapy, the Board of Podiatry, and the Board of Respiratory Care.

(1B)

“Boards of Behavioral Health” means the Board of Marriage and Family Therapy, the Board of Professional Counseling, the Board of Psychology, and the Board of Social Work.

(1C)

“Clinical laboratory practitioner” means a cytotechnologist, histologic technician, histotechnologist, medical laboratory technician, medical technologist, or a phlebotomist.

(2)

“Collaboration” means the process in which health professionals jointly contribute to the health care of patients with each collaborator performing actions he or she is licensed or otherwise authorized to perform pursuant to this chapter.

(3)

“Corporation Counsel” means the Corporation Counsel of the District of Columbia.

(4)

“Council” means the Council of the District of Columbia.

(5)

“Day” means calendar day unless otherwise specified in this chapter.

(6)

“District” means the District of Columbia.

(6A)

“Domestic partner” shall have the same meaning as provided in § 32-701(3).

(6B)

“Domestic partnership” shall have the same meaning as provided in § 32-701(4).

(7)

“Health occupation” means a practice that is regulated under the authority of this chapter.

(8)

“Health professional” means a person licensed under this chapter or permitted by this chapter to practice a health occupation in the District.

(9)

“Impaired health professional” means a health professional who is unable to perform his or her professional responsibilities reliably due to a mental or physical disorder, excessive use of alcohol, or habitual use of any narcotic or controlled substance or any other drug in excess of therapeutic amounts or without valid medical indication.

(10)

“Mayor” means the Mayor of the District of Columbia.

(11)

“Person” means an individual, corporation, trustee, receiver, guardian, representative, firm, partnership, society, school, or other entity.

(12)

Repealed.

(12A)

“Revocation” means termination of the right to practice a health profession and loss of licensure, registration, or certification for 5 years or more.

(13)

“State” means any of the several states, the District of Columbia, the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico, or any territory or possession of the United States.

(14)

“Superior Court” means the Superior Court of the District of Columbia.

(15)

“Suspension” means termination of the right to practice a health profession for a specified period of time of less than 5 years or until such time that the specified conditions in an order are satisfied.

(16)

“Veterinarian” means a person who is a graduate of a school of veterinary medicine and has received a doctorate in veterinary medicine or its equivalent.

(17)

“Veterinary euthanasia technician” means a person certified by the Mayor to euthanize animals within the District.

(18)

“Veterinary facility” means a fixed or mobile establishment where veterinary medicine is practiced. The term “veterinary facility” shall not include:

(A)

Wildlife rehabilitation facilities, as defined in § 47-2888.01(3); and

(B)

Animal shelters, as defined in § 47-2888.01(1).

(19)

“Veterinary technician” means a person certified by the Mayor to perform acts relating to maintenance of the health or treatment of an animal, except for the performance of surgery, diagnosis, or prescribing of medication for any animal.

Mar. 25, 1986, D.C. Law 6-99, § 101, 33 DCR 729
July 22, 1992, D.C. Law 9-126, § 2(a), 39 DCR 3824
Mar. 14, 1995, D.C. Law 10-203, § 2(a), 41 DCR 7707
Mar. 21, 1995, D.C. Law 10-231, § 2(a), 42 DCR 15
Mar. 23, 1995, D.C. Law 10-247, § 2(a), 42 DCR 457
Mar. 10, 2004, D.C. Law 15-88, § 2(b), 50 DCR 10999
Mar. 6, 2007, D.C. Law 16-219, § 2(b), 53 DCR 10211
June 25, 2008, D.C. Law 17-177, § 6(a), 55 DCR 3696
Sept. 12, 2008, D.C. Law 17-231, § 10(a), 55 DCR 6758
July 7, 2009, D.C. Law 18-15, § 2(b), 56 DCR 3616
July 18, 2009, D.C. Law 18-26, § 2(b), 56 DCR 4043
Mar. 26, 2014, D.C. Law 20-96, § 102(b), 61 DCR 1184
May 2, 2015, D.C. Law 20-272, § 2(b), 62 DCR 1911
This section is referenced in § 4-1321.02, § 7-2341.01, § 7-2341.03, § 7-2341.06, § 7-2341.08, § 21-501.01, § 22-1314.01, § 29-502, § 31-3171.01, and § 42-3505.07.
1981 Ed., § 2-3301.1.
D.C. Law 15-88, in par. (1), inserted “the Board of Marriage and Family Therapy,” after “the Board of Dietetics and Nutrition,”.
D.C. Law 16-219, in par. (1), inserted “Board of Audiology and Speech-Language Pathology,”.
D.C. Law 17-177 added par. (6A).
D.C. Law 17-231 added par. (6A).
D.C. Law 18-15 redesignated former par. (6A) as par. (6B); and added par. (6A).
D.C. Law 18-26 added pars. (1A), (1B), (12A), and (15).
The 2014 amendment by D.C. Law 20-96 substituted “Board of Long-Term Care Administration” for “Board of Nursing Home Administration” in (1) and (1A); substituted “the Board of Social Work, or the Board of Veterinary Medicine” for “or the Board of Social Work” in (1); and added (16), (17), (18), and (19).
The 2015 amendment by D.C. Law 20-272 added (1C).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2(b) of Health Occupations Revision General Amendment Emergency Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-146, July 28, 2009, 56 DCR 6308).
Delegation of authority pursuant to Law 6-99, see Mayor’s Order 86-110, July 18, 1986.
Delegation of authority pursuant to the “District of Columbia Health Occupations Revision Act of 1985”, see Mayor’s Order 98-140, August 20, 1998 ( 45 DCR 6593).
Health Regulation Reform Task Force: Title III of D.C. Law 12-86 provided in detail for the establishment of a Health Regulation Reform Task Force, to consist of 11 members appointed by the Mayor. The Health Task Force was required to submit a written review of the boards created by the District of Columbia Health Occupations Revision Act of 1985, Chapter 33 of Title 2 Chapter 12 of Title 3 including recommendations for the restructuring or consolidation of the boards and of the licensing procedures. The Task Force was to cease to exist 60 days after submission of the report.